Utah statutes.
78B-6-311.   Damages to party aggrieved.

If an actual loss or injury to a party in an action or special proceeding is caused by the contempt, the court, in lieu of or in addition to the fine or imprisonment imposed for the contempt, may order the person proceeded against to pay the party aggrieved a sum of money sufficient to indemnify him and to satisfy his costs and expenses.  The order and the acceptance of money under it is a bar to an action by the aggrieved party for the loss and injury.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

